Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-301
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 57-301 to 57-304, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) The term person includes one or more individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, corporations, legal representatives, trustees, and receivers in bankruptcy and reorganization of any group whether or not it is incorporated; and

(2) The term oil field equipment means oil field supplies, oil field machinery, materials, heavy machinery, buildings, tubing, tanks, boilers, engines, casing, wire lines, sucker rods, oil pipelines, gas pipelines, and all other material used in digging, drilling, torpedoing, operating, completing, maintaining, or repairing any such oil or gas wells or oil pipelines or gas pipelines, or in the construction or dismantling of refineries, casing-head gasoline plants, and carbon black plants.

Laws 1951, c. 185, § 1, p. 689;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 348.